Utah statutes.
76-7-314.5.   Killing an unborn child.

(1)  A person is guilty of killing an unborn child if the person causes the death of an unborn child by performing an abortion of the unborn child in violation of the provisions of Subsection 76-7-302(3).

(2)  A woman is not criminally liable for:

(a)  seeking to obtain, or obtaining, an abortion that is permitted by this part; or

(b)  a physician's failure to comply with Subsection 76-7-302(3)(b)(ii) or Section 76-7-305.



Amended by Chapter 13, 2010 General Session

